Illinois, session 104th, HB4070.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Sections 7 and 13 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2407)7    Sec. 7. Owners licenses. 8    (a) The Board shall issue owners licenses to persons or 9entities that apply for such licenses upon payment to the 10Board of the non-refundable license fee as provided in 11subsection (e) or (e-5) and upon a determination by the Board 12that the applicant is eligible for an owners license pursuant 13to this Act and the rules of the Board. From December 15, 2008 14(the effective date of Public Act 95-1008) until (i) 3 years 15after December 15, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1695-1008), (ii) the date any organization licensee begins to 17operate a slot machine or video game of chance under the 18Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or this Act, (iii) the date 19that payments begin under subsection (c-5) of Section 13 of 20this Act, (iv) the wagering tax imposed under Section 13 of 21this Act is increased by law to reflect a tax rate that is at 22least as stringent or more stringent than the tax rate 23contained in subsection (a-3) of Section 13, or (v) when an   HB4070- 2 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1owners licensee holding a license issued pursuant to Section 27.1 of this Act begins conducting gaming, whichever occurs 3first, as a condition of licensure and as an alternative 4source of payment for those funds payable under subsection 5(c-5) of Section 13 of this Act, any owners licensee that holds 6or receives its owners license on or after May 26, 2006 (the 7effective date of Public Act 94-804), other than an owners 8licensee operating a riverboat with adjusted gross receipts in 9calendar year 2004 of less than $200,000,000, must pay into 10the Horse Racing Equity Trust Fund, in addition to any other 11payments required under this Act, an amount equal to 3% of the 12adjusted gross receipts received by the owners licensee. The 13payments required under this Section shall be made by the 14owners licensee to the State Treasurer no later than 3:00 15o'clock p.m. of the day after the day when the adjusted gross 16receipts were received by the owners licensee. A person or 17entity is ineligible to receive an owners license if:18        (1) the person has been convicted of a felony under 19    the laws of this State, any other state, or the United 20    States;21        (2) the person has been convicted of any violation of 22    Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 23    Code of 2012, or substantially similar laws of any other 24    jurisdiction;25        (3) the person has submitted an application for a 26    license under this Act which contains false information;  HB4070- 3 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        (4) the person is a member of the Board;2        (5) a person defined in (1), (2), (3), or (4) is an 3    officer, director, or managerial employee of the entity;4        (6) the entity employs a person defined in (1), (2), 5    (3), or (4) who participates in the management or 6    operation of gambling operations authorized under this 7    Act;8        (7) (blank); or9        (8) a license of the person or entity issued under 10    this Act, or a license to own or operate gambling 11    facilities in any other jurisdiction, has been revoked.12    The Board is expressly prohibited from making changes to 13the requirement that licensees make payment into the Horse 14Racing Equity Trust Fund without the express authority of the 15Illinois General Assembly and making any other rule to 16implement or interpret Public Act 95-1008. For the purposes of 17this paragraph, "rules" is given the meaning given to that 18term in Section 1-70 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act.20    (b) In determining whether to grant an owners license to 21an applicant, the Board shall consider:22        (1) the character, reputation, experience, and 23    financial integrity of the applicants and of any other or 24    separate person that either:25            (A) controls, directly or indirectly, such 26        applicant; or  HB4070- 4 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1            (B) is controlled, directly or indirectly, by such 2        applicant or by a person which controls, directly or 3        indirectly, such applicant;4        (2) the facilities or proposed facilities for the 5    conduct of gambling;6        (3) the highest prospective total revenue to be 7    derived by the State from the conduct of gambling;8        (4) the extent to which the ownership of the applicant 9    reflects the diversity of the State by including minority 10    persons, women, and persons with a disability and the good 11    faith affirmative action plan of each applicant to 12    recruit, train and upgrade minority persons, women, and 13    persons with a disability in all employment 14    classifications; the Board shall further consider granting 15    an owners license and giving preference to an applicant 16    under this Section to applicants in which minority persons 17    and women hold ownership interest of at least 16% and 4%, 18    respectively; 19        (4.5) the extent to which the ownership of the 20    applicant includes veterans of service in the armed forces 21    of the United States, and the good faith affirmative 22    action plan of each applicant to recruit, train, and 23    upgrade veterans of service in the armed forces of the 24    United States in all employment classifications; 25        (5) the financial ability of the applicant to purchase 26    and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance;  HB4070- 5 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        (6) whether the applicant has adequate capitalization 2    to provide and maintain, for the duration of a license, a 3    riverboat or casino;4        (7) the extent to which the applicant exceeds or meets 5    other standards for the issuance of an owners license 6    which the Board may adopt by rule; 7        (8) the amount of the applicant's license bid;8        (9) the extent to which the applicant or the proposed 9    host municipality plans to enter into revenue sharing 10    agreements with communities other than the host 11    municipality;12        (10) the extent to which the ownership of an applicant 13    includes the most qualified number of minority persons, 14    women, and persons with a disability; and15        (11) whether the applicant has entered into a fully 16    executed construction project labor agreement with the 17    applicable local building trades council.18    (c) Each owners license shall specify the place where the 19casino shall operate or the riverboat shall operate and dock.20    (d) Each applicant shall submit with his or her 21application, on forms provided by the Board, 2 sets of his or 22her fingerprints.23    (e) In addition to any licenses authorized under 24subsection (e-5) of this Section, the Board may issue up to 10 25licenses authorizing the holders of such licenses to own 26riverboats. In the application for an owners license, the   HB4070- 6 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1applicant shall state the dock at which the riverboat is based 2and the water on which the riverboat will be located. The Board 3shall issue 5 licenses to become effective not earlier than 4January 1, 1991. Three of such licenses shall authorize 5riverboat gambling on the Mississippi River, or, with approval 6by the municipality in which the riverboat was docked on 7August 7, 2003 and with Board approval, be authorized to 8relocate to a new location, in a municipality that (1) borders 9on the Mississippi River or is within 5 miles of the city 10limits of a municipality that borders on the Mississippi River 11and (2) on August 7, 2003, had a riverboat conducting 12riverboat gambling operations pursuant to a license issued 13under this Act; one of which shall authorize riverboat 14gambling from a home dock in the city of East St. Louis; and 15one of which shall authorize riverboat gambling from a home 16dock in the City of Alton. One other license shall authorize 17riverboat gambling on the Illinois River in the City of East 18Peoria or, with Board approval, shall authorize land-based 19gambling operations anywhere within the corporate limits of 20the City of Peoria. The Board shall issue one additional 21license to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992, 22which shall authorize riverboat gambling on the Des Plaines 23River in Will County. The Board may issue 4 additional 24licenses to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992. 25In determining the water upon which riverboats will operate, 26the Board shall consider the economic benefit which riverboat   HB4070- 7 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1gambling confers on the State, and shall seek to assure that 2all regions of the State share in the economic benefits of 3riverboat gambling.4    In granting all licenses, the Board may give favorable 5consideration to economically depressed areas of the State, to 6applicants presenting plans which provide for significant 7economic development over a large geographic area, and to 8applicants who currently operate non-gambling riverboats in 9Illinois. The Board shall review all applications for owners 10licenses, and shall inform each applicant of the Board's 11decision. The Board may grant an owners license to an 12applicant that has not submitted the highest license bid, but 13if it does not select the highest bidder, the Board shall issue 14a written decision explaining why another applicant was 15selected and identifying the factors set forth in this Section 16that favored the winning bidder. The fee for issuance or 17renewal of a license pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be 18$250,000.19    (e-5) In addition to licenses authorized under subsection 20(e) of this Section:21        (1) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 22    the conduct of casino gambling in the City of Chicago;23        (2) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 24    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Danville;25        (3) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 26    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Waukegan;  HB4070- 8 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        (4) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 2    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Rockford;3        (5) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 4    the conduct of riverboat gambling in a municipality that 5    is wholly or partially located in one of the following 6    townships of Cook County: Bloom, Bremen, Calumet, Rich, 7    Thornton, or Worth Township; and8        (6) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 9    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the unincorporated 10    area of Williamson County adjacent to the Big Muddy River.11    Except for the license authorized under paragraph (1), 12each application for a license pursuant to this subsection 13(e-5) shall be submitted to the Board no later than 120 days 14after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31). 15All applications for a license under this subsection (e-5) 16shall include the nonrefundable application fee and the 17nonrefundable background investigation fee as provided in 18subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act. In the event that an 19applicant submits an application for a license pursuant to 20this subsection (e-5) prior to June 28, 2019 (the effective 21date of Public Act 101-31), such applicant shall submit the 22nonrefundable application fee and background investigation fee 23as provided in subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act no later 24than 6 months after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public 25Act 101-31). 26    The Board shall consider issuing a license pursuant to   HB4070- 9 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1paragraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection only after the 2corporate authority of the municipality or the county board of 3the county in which the riverboat or casino shall be located 4has certified to the Board the following:5        (i) that the applicant has negotiated with the 6    corporate authority or county board in good faith;7        (ii) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 8    county board have mutually agreed on the permanent 9    location of the riverboat or casino;10        (iii) that the applicant and the corporate authority 11    or county board have mutually agreed on the temporary 12    location of the riverboat or casino;13        (iv) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 14    the county board have mutually agreed on the percentage of 15    revenues that will be shared with the municipality or 16    county, if any;17        (v) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 18    county board have mutually agreed on any zoning, 19    licensing, public health, or other issues that are within 20    the jurisdiction of the municipality or county;21        (vi) that the corporate authority or county board has 22    passed a resolution or ordinance in support of the 23    riverboat or casino in the municipality or county; 24        (vii) the applicant for a license under paragraph (1) 25    has made a public presentation concerning its casino 26    proposal; and  HB4070- 10 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        (viii) the applicant for a license under paragraph (1) 2    has prepared a summary of its casino proposal and such 3    summary has been posted on a public website of the 4    municipality or the county. 5    At least 7 days before the corporate authority of a 6municipality or county board of the county submits a 7certification to the Board concerning items (i) through (viii) 8of this subsection, it shall hold a public hearing to discuss 9items (i) through (viii), as well as any other details 10concerning the proposed riverboat or casino in the 11municipality or county. The corporate authority or county 12board must subsequently memorialize the details concerning the 13proposed riverboat or casino in a resolution that must be 14adopted by a majority of the corporate authority or county 15board before any certification is sent to the Board. The Board 16shall not alter, amend, change, or otherwise interfere with 17any agreement between the applicant and the corporate 18authority of the municipality or county board of the county 19regarding the location of any temporary or permanent facility. 20    In addition, within 10 days after June 28, 2019 (the 21effective date of Public Act 101-31), the Board, with consent 22and at the expense of the City of Chicago, shall select and 23retain the services of a nationally recognized casino gaming 24feasibility consultant. Within 45 days after June 28, 2019 25(the effective date of Public Act 101-31), the consultant 26shall prepare and deliver to the Board a study concerning the   HB4070- 11 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1feasibility of, and the ability to finance, a casino in the 2City of Chicago. The feasibility study shall be delivered to 3the Mayor of the City of Chicago, the Governor, the President 4of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 5Representatives. Ninety days after receipt of the feasibility 6study, the Board shall make a determination, based on the 7results of the feasibility study, whether to recommend to the 8General Assembly that the terms of the license under paragraph 9(1) of this subsection (e-5) should be modified. The Board may 10begin accepting applications for the owners license under 11paragraph (1) of this subsection (e-5) upon the determination 12to issue such an owners license. 13    In addition, prior to the Board issuing the owners license 14authorized under paragraph (4) of subsection (e-5), an impact 15study shall be completed to determine what location in the 16city will provide the greater impact to the region, including 17the creation of jobs and the generation of tax revenue. 18    (e-10) The licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) of 19this Section shall be issued within 12 months after the date 20the license application is submitted. If the Board does not 21issue the licenses within that time period, then the Board 22shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it 23has not reached a determination and when it reasonably expects 24to make a determination. The fee for the issuance or renewal of 25a license issued pursuant to this subsection (e-10) shall be 26$250,000. Additionally, a licensee located outside of Cook   HB4070- 12 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1County shall pay a minimum initial fee of $17,500 per gaming 2position, and a licensee located in Cook County shall pay a 3minimum initial fee of $30,000 per gaming position. The 4initial fees payable under this subsection (e-10) shall be 5deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. If at any 6point after June 1, 2020 there are no pending applications for 7a license under subsection (e-5) and not all licenses 8authorized under subsection (e-5) have been issued, then the 9Board shall reopen the license application process for those 10licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) that have not been 11issued. The Board shall follow the licensing process provided 12in subsection (e-5) with all time frames tied to the last date 13of a final order issued by the Board under subsection (e-5) 14rather than the effective date of the amendatory Act.15    (e-15) Each licensee of a license authorized under 16subsection (e-5) of this Section shall make a reconciliation 17payment 3 years after the date the licensee begins operating 18in an amount equal to 75% of the adjusted gross receipts for 19the most lucrative 12-month period of operations, minus an 20amount equal to the initial payment per gaming position paid 21by the specific licensee. Each licensee shall pay a 22$15,000,000 reconciliation fee upon issuance of an owners 23license. If this calculation results in a negative amount, 24then the licensee is not entitled to any reimbursement of fees 25previously paid. This reconciliation payment may be made in 26installments over a period of no more than 6 years.   HB4070- 13 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    All payments by licensees under this subsection (e-15) 2shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund.3    (e-20) In addition to any other revocation powers granted 4to the Board under this Act, the Board may revoke the owners 5license of a licensee which fails to begin conducting gambling 6within 15 months of receipt of the Board's approval of the 7application if the Board determines that license revocation is 8in the best interests of the State.9    (f) The first 10 owners licenses issued under this Act 10shall permit the holder to own up to 2 riverboats and equipment 11thereon for a period of 3 years after the effective date of the 12license. Holders of the first 10 owners licenses must pay the 13annual license fee for each of the 3 years during which they 14are authorized to own riverboats.15    (g) Upon the termination, expiration, or revocation of 16each of the first 10 licenses, which shall be issued for a 173-year period, all licenses are renewable annually upon 18payment of the fee and a determination by the Board that the 19licensee continues to meet all of the requirements of this Act 20and the Board's rules. However, for licenses renewed on or 21after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 22General Assembly, renewal shall be for a period of 4 years. 23    (h) An owners license, except for an owners license issued 24under subsection (e-5) of this Section, shall entitle the 25licensee to own up to 2 riverboats. 26    An owners licensee of a casino or riverboat that is   HB4070- 14 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1located in the City of Chicago pursuant to paragraph (1) of 2subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of 3gaming positions to 4,000 for such owner. An owners licensee 4authorized under subsection (e) or paragraph (2), (3), (4), or 5(5) of subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number 6of gaming positions to 2,000 for any such owners license. An 7owners licensee authorized under paragraph (6) of subsection 8(e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of gaming 9positions to 1,200 for such owner. The initial fee for each 10gaming position obtained on or after June 28, 2019 (the 11effective date of Public Act 101-31) shall be a minimum of 12$17,500 for licensees not located in Cook County and a minimum 13of $30,000 for licensees located in Cook County, in addition 14to the reconciliation payment, as set forth in subsection 15(e-15) of this Section. The fees under this subsection (h) 16shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 17The fees under this subsection (h) that are paid by an owners 18licensee authorized under subsection (e) shall be paid by July 191, 2021.20    Each owners licensee under subsection (e) of this Section 21shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days after June 2228, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31). The Board 23may grant an extension to this 30-day period, provided that 24the owners licensee submits a written request and explanation 25as to why it is unable to reserve its positions within the 2630-day period.  HB4070- 15 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    Each owners licensee under subsection (e-5) of this 2Section shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days 3after issuance of its owners license. The Board may grant an 4extension to this 30-day period, provided that the owners 5licensee submits a written request and explanation as to why 6it is unable to reserve its positions within the 30-day 7period.8    A licensee may operate both of its riverboats 9concurrently, provided that the total number of gaming 10positions on both riverboats does not exceed the limit 11established pursuant to this subsection. Riverboats licensed 12to operate on the Mississippi River and the Illinois River 13south of Marshall County shall have an authorized capacity of 14at least 500 persons. Any other riverboat licensed under this 15Act shall have an authorized capacity of at least 400 persons.16    (h-5) An owners licensee who conducted gambling operations 17prior to January 1, 2012 and obtains positions pursuant to 18Public Act 101-31 shall make a reconciliation payment 3 years 19after any additional gaming positions begin operating in an 20amount equal to 75% of the owners licensee's average gross 21receipts for the most lucrative 12-month period of operations 22minus an amount equal to the initial fee that the owners 23licensee paid per additional gaming position. For purposes of 24this subsection (h-5), "average gross receipts" means (i) the 25increase in adjusted gross receipts for the most lucrative 2612-month period of operations over the adjusted gross receipts   HB4070- 16 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1for 2019, multiplied by (ii) the percentage derived by 2dividing the number of additional gaming positions that an 3owners licensee had obtained by the total number of gaming 4positions operated by the owners licensee. If this calculation 5results in a negative amount, then the owners licensee is not 6entitled to any reimbursement of fees previously paid. This 7reconciliation payment may be made in installments over a 8period of no more than 6 years. These reconciliation payments 9shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 10    (i) A licensed owner is authorized to apply to the Board 11for and, if approved therefor, to receive all licenses from 12the Board necessary for the operation of a riverboat or 13casino, including a liquor license, a license to prepare and 14serve food for human consumption, and other necessary 15licenses. All use, occupation, and excise taxes which apply to 16the sale of food and beverages in this State and all taxes 17imposed on the sale or use of tangible personal property apply 18to such sales aboard the riverboat or in the casino.19    (j) The Board may issue or re-issue a license authorizing 20a riverboat to dock in a municipality or approve a relocation 21under Section 11.2 only if, prior to the issuance or 22re-issuance of the license or approval, the governing body of 23the municipality in which the riverboat will dock has by a 24majority vote approved the docking of riverboats in the 25municipality. The Board may issue or re-issue a license 26authorizing a riverboat to dock in areas of a county outside   HB4070- 17 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1any municipality or approve a relocation under Section 11.2 2only if, prior to the issuance or re-issuance of the license or 3approval, the governing body of the county has by a majority 4vote approved of the docking of riverboats within such areas.5    (k) An owners licensee may conduct land-based gambling 6operations upon approval by the Board and payment of a fee of 7$250,000, which shall be deposited into the State Gaming Fund. 8    (l) An owners licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 9facility pending the construction of a permanent facility or 10the remodeling or relocation of an existing facility to 11accommodate gaming participants for up to 24 months after the 12temporary facility begins to conduct gaming. Upon request by 13an owners licensee and upon a showing of good cause by the 14owners licensee: (i) for a licensee authorized under paragraph 15(3) of subsection (e-5), the Board shall extend the period 16during which the licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 17facility by up to 30 months; and (ii) for all other licensees, 18the Board shall extend the period during which the licensee 19may conduct gaming at a temporary facility by up to 12 months. 20The Board shall make rules concerning the conduct of gaming 21from temporary facilities.22    (m) The Board shall conduct a survey to measure each 23operating casino license in the State regarding the adjusted 24gross receipts reported to the Board for the most recently 25concluded 12-month period. The Board shall conduct the survey 26within 12 months after the effective date of this amendatory   HB4070- 18 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly. After conducting the 2survey, the Board shall file a report, available to the 3public, with the Governor and the General Assembly listing all 4of the operating casino licenses, ranked by order of adjusted 5gross receipt productivity. 6    (n) The Board shall establish a request for proposals 7process to relocate the 3 lowest performing casinos based on 8the report under subsection (m) in which a municipality or 9county may submit a proposal requesting the authorization to 10host one of the 3 lowest performing casino's license within 11the municipality or county. The request for proposals process 12shall be established no later than 12 months after the report 13under subsection (m) is submitted. The request for proposals 14process shall be conducted in such a way that the Board shall 15make municipalities and counties aware of the doubled share 16tax of the adjusted gross receipts under subsection (b-9) of 17Section 13. 18    (o) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, each 19owner or operator of a casino license subject to relocation 20under subsection (n) has the right to relocate the casino to a 21new location as determined by the request for proposals 22process, and the relocation shall be completed no more than 5 23years after the conclusion of the request for proposals 24process and selection of a new location under the conditions 25set forth by the Board under subsection (n). 26(Source: P.A. 102-13, eff. 6-10-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21;   HB4070- 19 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1103-574, eff. 12-8-23.) 2    (230 ILCS 10/13)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2413)3    Sec. 13. Wagering tax; rate; distribution. 4    (a) Until January 1, 1998, a tax is imposed on the adjusted 5gross receipts received from gambling games authorized under 6this Act at the rate of 20%.7    (a-1) From January 1, 1998 until July 1, 2002, a privilege 8tax is imposed on persons engaged in the business of 9conducting riverboat gambling operations, based on the 10adjusted gross receipts received by a licensed owner from 11gambling games authorized under this Act at the following 12rates:13        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 14    including $25,000,000;15        20% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 16    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000;17        25% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 18    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000;19        30% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 20    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000;21        35% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 22    $100,000,000.23    (a-2) From July 1, 2002 until July 1, 2003, a privilege tax 24is imposed on persons engaged in the business of conducting 25riverboat gambling operations, other than licensed managers   HB4070- 20 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1conducting riverboat gambling operations on behalf of the 2State, based on the adjusted gross receipts received by a 3licensed owner from gambling games authorized under this Act 4at the following rates:5        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 6    including $25,000,000;7        22.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 8    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000;9        27.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 10    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000;11        32.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 12    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000;13        37.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 14    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000;15        45% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 16    $150,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000;17        50% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 18    $200,000,000.19    (a-3) Beginning July 1, 2003, a privilege tax is imposed 20on persons engaged in the business of conducting riverboat 21gambling operations, other than licensed managers conducting 22riverboat gambling operations on behalf of the State, based on 23the adjusted gross receipts received by a licensed owner from 24gambling games authorized under this Act at the following 25rates:26        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and   HB4070- 21 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    including $25,000,000;2        27.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 3    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $37,500,000;4        32.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 5    $37,500,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000;6        37.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 7    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000;8        45% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 9    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000;10        50% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 11    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $250,000,000;12        70% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 13    $250,000,000.14    An amount equal to the amount of wagering taxes collected 15under this subsection (a-3) that are in addition to the amount 16of wagering taxes that would have been collected if the 17wagering tax rates under subsection (a-2) were in effect shall 18be paid into the Common School Fund.19    The privilege tax imposed under this subsection (a-3) 20shall no longer be imposed beginning on the earlier of (i) July 211, 2005; (ii) the first date after June 20, 2003 that riverboat 22gambling operations are conducted pursuant to a dormant 23license; or (iii) the first day that riverboat gambling 24operations are conducted under the authority of an owners 25license that is in addition to the 10 owners licenses 26initially authorized under this Act. For the purposes of this   HB4070- 22 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1subsection (a-3), the term "dormant license" means an owners 2license that is authorized by this Act under which no 3riverboat gambling operations are being conducted on June 20, 42003.5    (a-4) Beginning on the first day on which the tax imposed 6under subsection (a-3) is no longer imposed and ending upon 7the imposition of the privilege tax under subsection (a-5) of 8this Section, a privilege tax is imposed on persons engaged in 9the business of conducting gambling operations, other than 10licensed managers conducting riverboat gambling operations on 11behalf of the State, based on the adjusted gross receipts 12received by a licensed owner from gambling games authorized 13under this Act at the following rates:14        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 15    including $25,000,000;16        22.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 17    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000;18        27.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 19    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000;20        32.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 21    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000;22        37.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 23    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000;24        45% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 25    $150,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000;26        50% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of   HB4070- 23 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    $200,000,000.2    For the imposition of the privilege tax in this subsection 3(a-4), amounts paid pursuant to item (1) of subsection (b) of 4Section 56 of the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 shall not 5be included in the determination of adjusted gross receipts. 6    (a-5)(1) Beginning on July 1, 2020, a privilege tax is 7imposed on persons engaged in the business of conducting 8gambling operations, other than the owners licensee under 9paragraph (1) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7 and licensed 10managers conducting riverboat gambling operations on behalf of 11the State, based on the adjusted gross receipts received by 12such licensee from the gambling games authorized under this 13Act. The privilege tax for all gambling games other than table 14games, including, but not limited to, slot machines, video 15game of chance gambling, and electronic gambling games shall 16be at the following rates:17        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 18    including $25,000,000;19        22.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 20    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000;21        27.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 22    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000;23        32.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 24    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000;25        37.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 26    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000;  HB4070- 24 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        45% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 2    $150,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000;3        50% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 4    $200,000,000.5    The privilege tax for table games shall be at the 6following rates:7        15% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 8    including $25,000,000;9        20% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 10    $25,000,000.11    For the imposition of the privilege tax in this subsection 12(a-5), amounts paid pursuant to item (1) of subsection (b) of 13Section 56 of the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 shall not 14be included in the determination of adjusted gross receipts.15    (2) Beginning on the first day that an owners licensee 16under paragraph (1) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7 conducts 17gambling operations, either in a temporary facility or a 18permanent facility, a privilege tax is imposed on persons 19engaged in the business of conducting gambling operations 20under paragraph (1) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7, other 21than licensed managers conducting riverboat gambling 22operations on behalf of the State, based on the adjusted gross 23receipts received by such licensee from the gambling games 24authorized under this Act. The privilege tax for all gambling 25games other than table games, including, but not limited to, 26slot machines, video game of chance gambling, and electronic   HB4070- 25 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1gambling games shall be at the following rates:2        12% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 3    including $25,000,000 to the State and 10.5% of annual 4    adjusted gross receipts up to and including $25,000,000 to 5    the City of Chicago;6        16% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 7    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000 to the State and 8    14% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 9    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $50,000,000 to the City of 10    Chicago;11        20.1% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 12    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000 to the State and 13    17.4% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 14    $50,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000 to the City of 15    Chicago;16        21.4% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 17    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000 to the State 18    and 18.6% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 19    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000 to the City of 20    Chicago;21        22.7% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 22    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000 to the State 23    and 19.8% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 24    $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000 to the City of 25    Chicago;26        24.1% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of   HB4070- 26 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    $150,000,000 but not exceeding $225,000,000 to the State 2    and 20.9% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 3    $150,000,000 but not exceeding $225,000,000 to the City of 4    Chicago;5        26.8% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 6    $225,000,000 but not exceeding $1,000,000,000 to the State 7    and 23.2% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 8    $225,000,000 but not exceeding $1,000,000,000 to the City 9    of Chicago;10        40% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 11    $1,000,000,000 to the State and 34.7% of annual gross 12    receipts in excess of $1,000,000,000 to the City of 13    Chicago.14    The privilege tax for table games shall be at the 15following rates:16        8.1% of annual adjusted gross receipts up to and 17    including $25,000,000 to the State and 6.9% of annual 18    adjusted gross receipts up to and including $25,000,000 to 19    the City of Chicago;20        10.7% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 21    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000 to the State and 22    9.3% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 23    $25,000,000 but not exceeding $75,000,000 to the City of 24    Chicago;25        11.2% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 26    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $175,000,000 to the State   HB4070- 27 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    and 9.8% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 2    $75,000,000 but not exceeding $175,000,000 to the City of 3    Chicago;4        13.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 5    $175,000,000 but not exceeding $225,000,000 to the State 6    and 11.5% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 7    $175,000,000 but not exceeding $225,000,000 to the City of 8    Chicago;9        15.1% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 10    $225,000,000 but not exceeding $275,000,000 to the State 11    and 12.9% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 12    $225,000,000 but not exceeding $275,000,000 to the City of 13    Chicago;14        16.2% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 15    $275,000,000 but not exceeding $375,000,000 to the State 16    and 13.8% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 17    $275,000,000 but not exceeding $375,000,000 to the City of 18    Chicago;19        18.9% of annual adjusted gross receipts in excess of 20    $375,000,000 to the State and 16.1% of annual gross 21    receipts in excess of $375,000,000 to the City of Chicago. 22    For the imposition of the privilege tax in this subsection 23(a-5), amounts paid pursuant to item (1) of subsection (b) of 24Section 56 of the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 shall not 25be included in the determination of adjusted gross receipts. 26    (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection   HB4070- 28 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1(a-5), for the first 10 years that the privilege tax is imposed 2under this subsection (a-5) or until the year preceding the 3calendar year in which paragraph (4) becomes operative, 4whichever occurs first, the privilege tax shall be imposed on 5the modified annual adjusted gross receipts of a riverboat or 6casino conducting gambling operations in the City of East St. 7Louis, unless:8        (1) the riverboat or casino fails to employ at least 9    450 people, except no minimum employment shall be required 10    during 2020 and 2021 or during periods that the riverboat 11    or casino is closed on orders of State officials for 12    public health emergencies or other emergencies not caused 13    by the riverboat or casino;14        (2) the riverboat or casino fails to maintain 15    operations in a manner consistent with this Act or is not a 16    viable riverboat or casino subject to the approval of the 17    Board; or18        (3) the owners licensee is not an entity in which 19    employees participate in an employee stock ownership plan 20    or in which the owners licensee sponsors a 401(k) 21    retirement plan and makes a matching employer contribution 22    equal to at least one-quarter of the first 12% or one-half 23    of the first 6% of each participating employee's 24    contribution, not to exceed any limitations under federal 25    laws and regulations. 26    (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection   HB4070- 29 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1(a-5), for 10 calendar years beginning in the year that 2gambling operations commence either in a temporary or 3permanent facility at an organization gaming facility located 4in the City of Collinsville, the privilege tax imposed under 5this subsection (a-5) on a riverboat or casino conducting 6gambling operations in the City of East St. Louis shall be 7reduced, if applicable, by an amount equal to the difference 8in adjusted gross receipts for the 2022 calendar year less the 9current year's adjusted gross receipts, unless:10        (A) the riverboat or casino fails to employ at least 11    350 people, except that no minimum employment shall be 12    required during periods that the riverboat or casino is 13    closed on orders of State officials for public health 14    emergencies or other emergencies not caused by the 15    riverboat or casino;16        (B) the riverboat or casino fails to maintain 17    operations in a manner consistent with this Act or is not a 18    viable riverboat or casino subject to the approval of the 19    Board; or20        (C) the riverboat or casino fails to submit audited 21    financial statements to the Board prepared by an 22    accounting firm that has been preapproved by the Board and 23    such statements were prepared in accordance with the 24    provisions of the Financial Accounting Standards Board 25    Accounting Standards Codification under nongovernmental 26    accounting principles generally accepted in the United   HB4070- 30 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    States. 2    As used in this subsection (a-5), "modified annual 3adjusted gross receipts" means:4        (A) for calendar year 2020, the annual adjusted gross 5    receipts for the current year minus the difference between 6    an amount equal to the average annual adjusted gross 7    receipts from a riverboat or casino conducting gambling 8    operations in the City of East St. Louis for 2014, 2015, 9    2016, 2017, and 2018 and the annual adjusted gross 10    receipts for 2018; 11        (B) for calendar year 2021, the annual adjusted gross 12    receipts for the current year minus the difference between 13    an amount equal to the average annual adjusted gross 14    receipts from a riverboat or casino conducting gambling 15    operations in the City of East St. Louis for 2014, 2015, 16    2016, 2017, and 2018 and the annual adjusted gross 17    receipts for 2019; and 18        (C) for calendar years 2022 through 2029, the annual 19    adjusted gross receipts for the current year minus the 20    difference between an amount equal to the average annual 21    adjusted gross receipts from a riverboat or casino 22    conducting gambling operations in the City of East St. 23    Louis for 3 years preceding the current year and the 24    annual adjusted gross receipts for the immediately 25    preceding year. 26    (a-6) From June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act   HB4070- 31 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1101-31) until June 30, 2023, an owners licensee that conducted 2gambling operations prior to January 1, 2011 shall receive a 3dollar-for-dollar credit against the tax imposed under this 4Section for any renovation or construction costs paid by the 5owners licensee, but in no event shall the credit exceed 6$2,000,000.7    Additionally, from June 28, 2019 (the effective date of 8Public Act 101-31) until December 31, 2024, an owners licensee 9that (i) is located within 15 miles of the Missouri border, and 10(ii) has at least 3 riverboats, casinos, or their equivalent 11within a 45-mile radius, may be authorized to relocate to a new 12location with the approval of both the unit of local 13government designated as the home dock and the Board, so long 14as the new location is within the same unit of local government 15and no more than 3 miles away from its original location. Such 16owners licensee shall receive a credit against the tax imposed 17under this Section equal to 8% of the total project costs, as 18approved by the Board, for any renovation or construction 19costs paid by the owners licensee for the construction of the 20new facility, provided that the new facility is operational by 21July 1, 2024. In determining whether or not to approve a 22relocation, the Board must consider the extent to which the 23relocation will diminish the gaming revenues received by other 24Illinois gaming facilities.25    (a-7) Beginning in the initial adjustment year and through 26the final adjustment year, if the total obligation imposed   HB4070- 32 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1pursuant to either subsection (a-5) or (a-6) will result in an 2owners licensee receiving less after-tax adjusted gross 3receipts than it received in calendar year 2018, then the 4total amount of privilege taxes that the owners licensee is 5required to pay for that calendar year shall be reduced to the 6extent necessary so that the after-tax adjusted gross receipts 7in that calendar year equals the after-tax adjusted gross 8receipts in calendar year 2018, but the privilege tax 9reduction shall not exceed the annual adjustment cap. If 10pursuant to this subsection (a-7), the total obligation 11imposed pursuant to either subsection (a-5) or (a-6) shall be 12reduced, then the owners licensee shall not receive a refund 13from the State at the end of the subject calendar year but 14instead shall be able to apply that amount as a credit against 15any payments it owes to the State in the following calendar 16year to satisfy its total obligation under either subsection 17(a-5) or (a-6). The credit for the final adjustment year shall 18occur in the calendar year following the final adjustment 19year.20    If an owners licensee that conducted gambling operations 21prior to January 1, 2019 expands its riverboat or casino, 22including, but not limited to, with respect to its gaming 23floor, additional non-gaming amenities such as restaurants, 24bars, and hotels and other additional facilities, and incurs 25construction and other costs related to such expansion from 26June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31) until   HB4070- 33 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1June 28, 2029, then for each $15,000,000 spent for any such 2construction or other costs related to expansion paid by the 3owners licensee, the final adjustment year shall be extended 4by one year and the annual adjustment cap shall increase by 50.2% of adjusted gross receipts during each calendar year 6until and including the final adjustment year. No further 7modifications to the final adjustment year or annual 8adjustment cap shall be made after $75,000,000 is incurred in 9construction or other costs related to expansion so that the 10final adjustment year shall not extend beyond the 9th calendar 11year after the initial adjustment year, not including the 12initial adjustment year, and the annual adjustment cap shall 13not exceed 4% of adjusted gross receipts in a particular 14calendar year. Construction and other costs related to 15expansion shall include all project related costs, including, 16but not limited to, all hard and soft costs, financing costs, 17on or off-site ground, road or utility work, cost of gaming 18equipment and all other personal property, initial fees 19assessed for each incremental gaming position, and the cost of 20incremental land acquired for such expansion. Soft costs shall 21include, but not be limited to, legal fees, architect, 22engineering and design costs, other consultant costs, 23insurance cost, permitting costs, and pre-opening costs 24related to the expansion, including, but not limited to, any 25of the following: marketing, real estate taxes, personnel, 26training, travel and out-of-pocket expenses, supply,   HB4070- 34 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1inventory, and other costs, and any other project related soft 2costs. 3    To be eligible for the tax credits in subsection (a-6), 4all construction contracts shall include a requirement that 5the contractor enter into a project labor agreement with the 6building and construction trades council with geographic 7jurisdiction of the location of the proposed gaming facility.8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 9(a-7), this subsection (a-7) does not apply to an owners 10licensee unless such owners licensee spends at least 11$15,000,000 on construction and other costs related to its 12expansion, excluding the initial fees assessed for each 13incremental gaming position. 14    This subsection (a-7) does not apply to owners licensees 15authorized pursuant to subsection (e-5) of Section 7 of this 16Act.17    For purposes of this subsection (a-7):18    "Building and construction trades council" means any 19organization representing multiple construction entities that 20are monitoring or attentive to compliance with public or 21workers' safety laws, wage and hour requirements, or other 22statutory requirements or that are making or maintaining 23collective bargaining agreements. 24    "Initial adjustment year" means the year commencing on 25January 1 of the calendar year immediately following the 26earlier of the following:   HB4070- 35 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1        (1) the commencement of gambling operations, either in 2    a temporary or permanent facility, with respect to the 3    owners license authorized under paragraph (1) of 4    subsection (e-5) of Section 7 of this Act; or5        (2) June 28, 2021 (24 months after the effective date 6    of Public Act 101-31); 7provided the initial adjustment year shall not commence 8earlier than June 28, 2020 (12 months after the effective date 9of Public Act 101-31). 10    "Final adjustment year" means the 2nd calendar year after 11the initial adjustment year, not including the initial 12adjustment year, and as may be extended further as described 13in this subsection (a-7). 14    "Annual adjustment cap" means 3% of adjusted gross 15receipts in a particular calendar year, and as may be 16increased further as otherwise described in this subsection 17(a-7). 18    (a-8) Riverboat gambling operations conducted by a 19licensed manager on behalf of the State are not subject to the 20tax imposed under this Section.21    (a-9) Beginning on January 1, 2020, the calculation of 22gross receipts or adjusted gross receipts, for the purposes of 23this Section, for a riverboat, a casino, or an organization 24gaming facility shall not include the dollar amount of 25non-cashable vouchers, coupons, and electronic promotions 26redeemed by wagerers upon the riverboat, in the casino, or in   HB4070- 36 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1the organization gaming facility up to and including an amount 2not to exceed 20% of a riverboat's, a casino's, or an 3organization gaming facility's adjusted gross receipts.4    The Illinois Gaming Board shall submit to the General 5Assembly a comprehensive report no later than March 31, 2023 6detailing, at a minimum, the effect of removing non-cashable 7vouchers, coupons, and electronic promotions from this 8calculation on net gaming revenues to the State in calendar 9years 2020 through 2022, the increase or reduction in wagerers 10as a result of removing non-cashable vouchers, coupons, and 11electronic promotions from this calculation, the effect of the 12tax rates in subsection (a-5) on net gaming revenues to this 13State, and proposed modifications to the calculation. 14    (a-10) The taxes imposed by this Section shall be paid by 15the licensed owner or the organization gaming licensee to the 16Board not later than 5:00 o'clock p.m. of the day after the day 17when the wagers were made.18    (a-15) If the privilege tax imposed under subsection (a-3) 19is no longer imposed pursuant to item (i) of the last paragraph 20of subsection (a-3), then by June 15 of each year, each owners 21licensee, other than an owners licensee that admitted 221,000,000 persons or fewer in calendar year 2004, must, in 23addition to the payment of all amounts otherwise due under 24this Section, pay to the Board a reconciliation payment in the 25amount, if any, by which the licensed owner's base amount 26exceeds the amount of net privilege tax paid by the licensed   HB4070- 37 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1owner to the Board in the then current State fiscal year. A 2licensed owner's net privilege tax obligation due for the 3balance of the State fiscal year shall be reduced up to the 4total of the amount paid by the licensed owner in its June 15 5reconciliation payment. The obligation imposed by this 6subsection (a-15) is binding on any person, firm, corporation, 7or other entity that acquires an ownership interest in any 8such owners license. The obligation imposed under this 9subsection (a-15) terminates on the earliest of: (i) July 1, 102007, (ii) the first day after August 23, 2005 (the effective 11date of Public Act 94-673) that riverboat gambling operations 12are conducted pursuant to a dormant license, (iii) the first 13day that riverboat gambling operations are conducted under the 14authority of an owners license that is in addition to the 10 15owners licenses initially authorized under this Act, or (iv) 16the first day that a licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing 17Act of 1975 conducts gaming operations with slot machines or 18other electronic gaming devices. The Board must reduce the 19obligation imposed under this subsection (a-15) by an amount 20the Board deems reasonable for any of the following reasons: 21(A) an act or acts of God, (B) an act of bioterrorism or 22terrorism or a bioterrorism or terrorism threat that was 23investigated by a law enforcement agency, or (C) a condition 24beyond the control of the owners licensee that does not result 25from any act or omission by the owners licensee or any of its 26agents and that poses a hazardous threat to the health and   HB4070- 38 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1safety of patrons. If an owners licensee pays an amount in 2excess of its liability under this Section, the Board shall 3apply the overpayment to future payments required under this 4Section.5    For purposes of this subsection (a-15):6    "Act of God" means an incident caused by the operation of 7an extraordinary force that cannot be foreseen, that cannot be 8avoided by the exercise of due care, and for which no person 9can be held liable. 10    "Base amount" means the following:11        For a riverboat in Alton, $31,000,000. 12        For a riverboat in East Peoria, $43,000,000. 13        For the Empress riverboat in Joliet, $86,000,000. 14        For a riverboat in Metropolis, $45,000,000. 15        For the Harrah's riverboat in Joliet, $114,000,000. 16        For a riverboat in Aurora, $86,000,000. 17        For a riverboat in East St. Louis, $48,500,000. 18        For a riverboat in Elgin, $198,000,000. 19    "Dormant license" has the meaning ascribed to it in 20subsection (a-3). 21    "Net privilege tax" means all privilege taxes paid by a 22licensed owner to the Board under this Section, less all 23payments made from the State Gaming Fund pursuant to 24subsection (b) of this Section.25    The changes made to this subsection (a-15) by Public Act 2694-839 are intended to restate and clarify the intent of   HB4070- 39 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1Public Act 94-673 with respect to the amount of the payments 2required to be made under this subsection by an owners 3licensee to the Board. 4    (b) From the tax revenue from riverboat or casino gambling 5deposited in the State Gaming Fund under this Section, an 6amount equal to 5% of adjusted gross receipts generated by a 7riverboat or a casino, other than a riverboat or casino 8designated in paragraph (1), (3), or (4) of subsection (e-5) 9of Section 7, shall be paid monthly, subject to appropriation 10by the General Assembly, to the unit of local government in 11which the casino is located or that is designated as the home 12dock of the riverboat. Notwithstanding anything to the 13contrary, beginning on the first day that an owners licensee 14under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subsection 15(e-5) of Section 7 conducts gambling operations, either in a 16temporary facility or a permanent facility, and for 2 years 17thereafter, a unit of local government designated as the home 18dock of a riverboat whose license was issued before January 1, 192019, other than a riverboat conducting gambling operations in 20the City of East St. Louis, shall not receive less under this 21subsection (b) than the amount the unit of local government 22received under this subsection (b) in calendar year 2018. 23Notwithstanding anything to the contrary and because the City 24of East St. Louis is a financially distressed city, beginning 25on the first day that an owners licensee under paragraph (1), 26(2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7   HB4070- 40 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1conducts gambling operations, either in a temporary facility 2or a permanent facility, and for 10 years thereafter, a unit of 3local government designated as the home dock of a riverboat 4conducting gambling operations in the City of East St. Louis 5shall not receive less under this subsection (b) than the 6amount the unit of local government received under this 7subsection (b) in calendar year 2018. 8    From the tax revenue deposited in the State Gaming Fund 9pursuant to riverboat or casino gambling operations conducted 10by a licensed manager on behalf of the State, an amount equal 11to 5% of adjusted gross receipts generated pursuant to those 12riverboat or casino gambling operations shall be paid monthly, 13subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, to the unit 14of local government that is designated as the home dock of the 15riverboat upon which those riverboat gambling operations are 16conducted or in which the casino is located.17    From the tax revenue from riverboat or casino gambling 18deposited in the State Gaming Fund under this Section, an 19amount equal to 5% of the adjusted gross receipts generated by 20a riverboat designated in paragraph (3) of subsection (e-5) of 21Section 7 shall be divided and remitted monthly, subject to 22appropriation, as follows: 70% to Waukegan, 10% to Park City, 2315% to North Chicago, and 5% to Lake County.24    From the tax revenue from riverboat or casino gambling 25deposited in the State Gaming Fund under this Section, an 26amount equal to 5% of the adjusted gross receipts generated by   HB4070- 41 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1a riverboat designated in paragraph (4) of subsection (e-5) of 2Section 7 shall be remitted monthly, subject to appropriation, 3as follows: 70% to the City of Rockford, 5% to the City of 4Loves Park, 5% to the Village of Machesney, and 20% to 5Winnebago County.6    From the tax revenue from riverboat or casino gambling 7deposited in the State Gaming Fund under this Section, an 8amount equal to 5% of the adjusted gross receipts generated by 9a riverboat designated in paragraph (5) of subsection (e-5) of 10Section 7 shall be remitted monthly, subject to appropriation, 11as follows: 2% to the unit of local government in which the 12riverboat or casino is located, and 3% shall be distributed: 13(A) in accordance with a regional capital development plan 14entered into by the following communities: Village of Beecher, 15City of Blue Island, Village of Burnham, City of Calumet City, 16Village of Calumet Park, City of Chicago Heights, City of 17Country Club Hills, Village of Crestwood, Village of Crete, 18Village of Dixmoor, Village of Dolton, Village of East Hazel 19Crest, Village of Flossmoor, Village of Ford Heights, Village 20of Glenwood, City of Harvey, Village of Hazel Crest, Village 21of Homewood, Village of Lansing, Village of Lynwood, City of 22Markham, Village of Matteson, Village of Midlothian, Village 23of Monee, City of Oak Forest, Village of Olympia Fields, 24Village of Orland Hills, Village of Orland Park, City of Palos 25Heights, Village of Park Forest, Village of Phoenix, Village 26of Posen, Village of Richton Park, Village of Riverdale,   HB4070- 42 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1Village of Robbins, Village of Sauk Village, Village of South 2Chicago Heights, Village of South Holland, Village of Steger, 3Village of Thornton, Village of Tinley Park, Village of 4University Park, and Village of Worth; or (B) if no regional 5capital development plan exists, equally among the communities 6listed in item (A) to be used for capital expenditures or 7public pension payments, or both. 8    Units of local government may refund any portion of the 9payment that they receive pursuant to this subsection (b) to 10the riverboat or casino.11    (b-4) Beginning on the first day a licensee under 12subsection (e-5) of Section 7 conducts gambling operations or 1330 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14103rd General Assembly, whichever is sooner, either in a 15temporary facility or a permanent facility, and ending on July 1631, 2042, from the tax revenue deposited in the State Gaming 17Fund under this Section, $5,000,000 shall be paid annually, 18subject to appropriation, to the host municipality of that 19owners licensee of a license issued or re-issued pursuant to 20Section 7.1 of this Act before January 1, 2012. Payments 21received by the host municipality pursuant to this subsection 22(b-4) may not be shared with any other unit of local 23government. 24    (b-5) Beginning on June 28, 2019 (the effective date of 25Public Act 101-31), from the tax revenue deposited in the 26State Gaming Fund under this Section, an amount equal to 3% of   HB4070- 43 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1adjusted gross receipts generated by each organization gaming 2facility located outside Madison County shall be paid monthly, 3subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, to a 4municipality other than the Village of Stickney in which each 5organization gaming facility is located or, if the 6organization gaming facility is not located within a 7municipality, to the county in which the organization gaming 8facility is located, except as otherwise provided in this 9Section. From the tax revenue deposited in the State Gaming 10Fund under this Section, an amount equal to 3% of adjusted 11gross receipts generated by an organization gaming facility 12located in the Village of Stickney shall be paid monthly, 13subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, as follows: 1425% to the Village of Stickney, 5% to the City of Berwyn, 50% 15to the Town of Cicero, and 20% to the Stickney Public Health 16District.17    From the tax revenue deposited in the State Gaming Fund 18under this Section, an amount equal to 5% of adjusted gross 19receipts generated by an organization gaming facility located 20in the City of Collinsville shall be paid monthly, subject to 21appropriation by the General Assembly, as follows: 30% to the 22City of Alton, 30% to the City of East St. Louis, and 40% to 23the City of Collinsville. 24    Municipalities and counties may refund any portion of the 25payment that they receive pursuant to this subsection (b-5) to 26the organization gaming facility.   HB4070- 44 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    (b-6) Beginning on June 28, 2019 (the effective date of 2Public Act 101-31), from the tax revenue deposited in the 3State Gaming Fund under this Section, an amount equal to 2% of 4adjusted gross receipts generated by an organization gaming 5facility located outside Madison County shall be paid monthly, 6subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, to the 7county in which the organization gaming facility is located 8for the purposes of its criminal justice system or health care 9system. 10    Counties may refund any portion of the payment that they 11receive pursuant to this subsection (b-6) to the organization 12gaming facility. 13    (b-7) From the tax revenue from the organization gaming 14licensee located in one of the following townships of Cook 15County: Bloom, Bremen, Calumet, Orland, Rich, Thornton, or 16Worth, an amount equal to 5% of the adjusted gross receipts 17generated by that organization gaming licensee shall be 18remitted monthly, subject to appropriation, as follows: 2% to 19the unit of local government in which the organization gaming 20licensee is located, and 3% shall be distributed: (A) in 21accordance with a regional capital development plan entered 22into by the following communities: Village of Beecher, City of 23Blue Island, Village of Burnham, City of Calumet City, Village 24of Calumet Park, City of Chicago Heights, City of Country Club 25Hills, Village of Crestwood, Village of Crete, Village of 26Dixmoor, Village of Dolton, Village of East Hazel Crest,   HB4070- 45 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1Village of Flossmoor, Village of Ford Heights, Village of 2Glenwood, City of Harvey, Village of Hazel Crest, Village of 3Homewood, Village of Lansing, Village of Lynwood, City of 4Markham, Village of Matteson, Village of Midlothian, Village 5of Monee, City of Oak Forest, Village of Olympia Fields, 6Village of Orland Hills, Village of Orland Park, City of Palos 7Heights, Village of Park Forest, Village of Phoenix, Village 8of Posen, Village of Richton Park, Village of Riverdale, 9Village of Robbins, Village of Sauk Village, Village of South 10Chicago Heights, Village of South Holland, Village of Steger, 11Village of Thornton, Village of Tinley Park, Village of 12University Park, and Village of Worth; or (B) if no regional 13capital development plan exists, equally among the communities 14listed in item (A) to be used for capital expenditures or 15public pension payments, or both. 16    (b-8) In lieu of the payments under subsection (b) of this 17Section, from the tax revenue deposited in the State Gaming 18Fund pursuant to riverboat or casino gambling operations 19conducted by an owners licensee under paragraph (1) of 20subsection (e-5) of Section 7, an amount equal to the tax 21revenue generated from the privilege tax imposed by paragraph 22(2) of subsection (a-5) that is to be paid to the City of 23Chicago shall be paid monthly, subject to appropriation by the 24General Assembly, as follows: (1) an amount equal to 0.5% of 25the annual adjusted gross receipts generated by the owners 26licensee under paragraph (1) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7   HB4070- 46 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1to the home rule county in which the owners licensee is located 2for the purpose of enhancing the county's criminal justice 3system; and (2) the balance to the City of Chicago and shall be 4expended or obligated by the City of Chicago for pension 5payments in accordance with Public Act 99-506. 6    (b-9) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this 7subsection applies to the adjusted gross receipts tax and its 8division by enumerated shares to enumerated eligible 9recipients subsequent to any relocation of a casino under 10subsection (n) of Section 7, and the share of the adjusted 11gross receipts provided under subsections (b), (b-4), and 12(b-8), measured by percentage of the adjusted gross receipts, 13shall continue to be paid to the former host municipality or 14county by 2 times the amount the share of the adjusted gross 15receipts that had previously been paid to the former host 16municipality or county as provided in subsections (b), (b-4), 17and (b-8). This redistribution of the adjusted gross receipts 18shall hold all other enumerated recipient's of adjusted gross 19receipt shares harmless other than the amounts under 20subsections (c), (c-10), (c-20), (c-25), (c-35), and (d-5). 21    (c) Appropriations, as approved by the General Assembly, 22may be made from the State Gaming Fund to the Board (i) for the 23administration and enforcement of this Act and the Video 24Gaming Act, (ii) for distribution to the Illinois State Police 25and to the Department of Revenue for the enforcement of this 26Act and the Video Gaming Act, and (iii) to the Department of   HB4070- 47 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1Human Services for the administration of programs to treat 2problem gambling, including problem gambling from sports 3wagering. The Board's annual appropriations request must 4separately state its funding needs for the regulation of 5gaming authorized under Section 7.7, riverboat gaming, casino 6gaming, video gaming, and sports wagering.7    (c-2) An amount equal to 2% of the adjusted gross receipts 8generated by an organization gaming facility located within a 9home rule county with a population of over 3,000,000 10inhabitants shall be paid, subject to appropriation from the 11General Assembly, from the State Gaming Fund to the home rule 12county in which the organization gaming licensee is located 13for the purpose of enhancing the county's criminal justice 14system. 15    (c-3) Appropriations, as approved by the General Assembly, 16may be made from the tax revenue deposited into the State 17Gaming Fund from organization gaming licensees pursuant to 18this Section for the administration and enforcement of this 19Act. 20    (c-4) After payments required under subsections (b), 21(b-5), (b-6), (b-7), (c), (c-2), and (c-3) have been made from 22the tax revenue from organization gaming licensees deposited 23into the State Gaming Fund under this Section, all remaining 24amounts from organization gaming licensees shall be 25transferred into the Capital Projects Fund.26    (c-5) (Blank).  HB4070- 48 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    (c-10) Each year the General Assembly shall appropriate 2from the General Revenue Fund to the Education Assistance Fund 3an amount equal to the amount paid into the Horse Racing Equity 4Fund pursuant to subsection (c-5) in the prior calendar year.5    (c-15) After the payments required under subsections (b), 6(c), and (c-5) have been made, an amount equal to 2% of the 7adjusted gross receipts of (1) an owners licensee that 8relocates pursuant to Section 11.2, (2) an owners licensee 9conducting riverboat gambling operations pursuant to an owners 10license that is initially issued after June 25, 1999, or (3) 11the first riverboat gambling operations conducted by a 12licensed manager on behalf of the State under Section 7.3, 13whichever comes first, shall be paid, subject to appropriation 14from the General Assembly, from the State Gaming Fund to each 15home rule county with a population of over 3,000,000 16inhabitants for the purpose of enhancing the county's criminal 17justice system.18    (c-20) Each year the General Assembly shall appropriate 19from the General Revenue Fund to the Education Assistance Fund 20an amount equal to the amount paid to each home rule county 21with a population of over 3,000,000 inhabitants pursuant to 22subsection (c-15) in the prior calendar year.23    (c-21) After the payments required under subsections (b), 24(b-4), (b-5), (b-6), (b-7), (b-8), (c), (c-3), and (c-4) have 25been made, an amount equal to 0.5% of the adjusted gross 26receipts generated by the owners licensee under paragraph (1)   HB4070- 49 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1of subsection (e-5) of Section 7 shall be paid monthly, 2subject to appropriation from the General Assembly, from the 3State Gaming Fund to the home rule county in which the owners 4licensee is located for the purpose of enhancing the county's 5criminal justice system. 6    (c-22) After the payments required under subsections (b), 7(b-4), (b-5), (b-6), (b-7), (b-8), (c), (c-3), (c-4), and 8(c-21) have been made, an amount equal to 2% of the adjusted 9gross receipts generated by the owners licensee under 10paragraph (5) of subsection (e-5) of Section 7 shall be paid, 11subject to appropriation from the General Assembly, from the 12State Gaming Fund to the home rule county in which the owners 13licensee is located for the purpose of enhancing the county's 14criminal justice system. 15    (c-25) From July 1, 2013 and each July 1 thereafter 16through July 1, 2019, $1,600,000 shall be transferred from the 17State Gaming Fund to the Chicago State University Education 18Improvement Fund.19    On July 1, 2020 and each July 1 thereafter, $3,000,000 20shall be transferred from the State Gaming Fund to the Chicago 21State University Education Improvement Fund. 22    (c-30) On July 1, 2013 or as soon as possible thereafter, 23$92,000,000 shall be transferred from the State Gaming Fund to 24the School Infrastructure Fund and $23,000,000 shall be 25transferred from the State Gaming Fund to the Horse Racing 26Equity Fund.   HB4070- 50 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1    (c-35) Beginning on July 1, 2013, in addition to any 2amount transferred under subsection (c-30) of this Section, 3$5,530,000 shall be transferred monthly from the State Gaming 4Fund to the School Infrastructure Fund. 5    (d) From time to time, through June 30, 2021, the Board 6shall transfer the remainder of the funds generated by this 7Act into the Education Assistance Fund.8    (d-5) Beginning on July 1, 2021, on the last day of each 9month, or as soon thereafter as possible, after all the 10required expenditures, distributions, and transfers have been 11made from the State Gaming Fund for the month pursuant to 12subsections (b) through (c-35), at the direction of the Board, 13the Comptroller shall direct and the Treasurer shall transfer 14$22,500,000, along with any deficiencies in such amounts from 15prior months in the same fiscal year, from the State Gaming 16Fund to the Education Assistance Fund; then, at the direction 17of the Board, the Comptroller shall direct and the Treasurer 18shall transfer the remainder of the funds generated by this 19Act, if any, from the State Gaming Fund to the Capital Projects 20Fund. 21    (e) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the unit of local 22government designated as the home dock of the riverboat from 23entering into agreements with other units of local government 24in this State or in other states to share its portion of the 25tax revenue.26    (f) To the extent practicable, the Board shall administer   HB4070- 51 -LRB104 13763 LNS 26514 b1and collect the wagering taxes imposed by this Section in a 2manner consistent with the provisions of Sections 4, 5, 5a, 35b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 8, 9, and 10 of 4the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and Section 3-7 of the 5Uniform Penalty and Interest Act.6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-689, eff. 12-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-8, eff. 86-7-23; 103-574, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)